Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-203
No-contact period; waiver by victim.

(1) A victim may waive the no-contact period by signing the written waiver in the form provided for in section 26-204.

(2) Additionally, at any time during the no-contact period, a victim may waive the no-contact period by contacting the law enforcement agency of the arresting officer, signing a written waiver form, and providing such form to the agency.

Laws 2026, LB935, § 28.
January 1, 2027